src/egy_lex/adv.lexc
!!!adv.lexc!!!

LEXICON Root
Adv;

LEXICON AdvInf
0:0 #;

LEXICON Adv
دائما AdvInf;
هنا AdvInf;
هناك AdvInf;
دايما AdvInf;
امبارح AdvInf;
النهارده AdvInf;
بكرة AdvInf;
دلوقت AdvInf;
زمان AdvInf;
قريب AdvInf;
ابدا AdvInf;
بدري AdvInf;
وخري AdvInf;
متاخر AdvInf;
اخيرا AdvInf;
عادة AdvInf;
غالبا AdvInf;
احيانا AdvInf;
ساعات AdvInf;
قوي AdvInf;
خالص AdvInf;
جدا AdvInf;
كتير AdvInf;
كمان AdvInf;
تقريبا AdvInf;
حوالي AdvInf;
شوية AdvInf;
كده AdvInf;
بسرعة AdvInf;
قوام AdvInf;
بشويش AdvInf;
حالا AdvInf;
حاليا AdvInf;
سوا AdvInf;
لوحد AdvInf;
عمدا AdvInf;
